Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 14 Nonprofit Food Sales and Food Service

26-2-390.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Nonprofit food sales and food service” means the temporary sale or service of food items by an organization at an event sponsored by a county, municipality, or organization or the temporary sale of food items by an organization if such sale is sponsored by a religious, charitable, or nonprofit corporation, including but not limited to churches, schools, clubs, lodges, or other such organizations.

“Organization” means an organization exempt from taxes under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 48-7-25 or under Section 501(d) or paragraphs (1) through (8) or paragraph (10) of Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, as that code is defined in Code Section 48-1-2.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-2-390

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1174, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1220, § 3; Ga. L. 2020, p. 808, § 4/SB 345.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 808, § 4/SB 345, effective August 5, 2020, reenacted this Code section without change.

26-2-391.
Permits for nonprofit food sales and food service at events; duration of permit; issuance of subsequent permits.

A county or municipality shall be authorized to issue permits for the operation of nonprofit food sales and food service at events sponsored by the county, municipality, or an organization. For any permit issued pursuant to this Code section to be valid, the event must be held on property belonging to the sponsoring county, municipality, or organization or on the property of a party that has provided consent for use of such property for such event.

A permit shall be valid for:

A period of up to 120 consecutive hours and another permit shall not be issued to the organization holding such permit until five days have elapsed from the date of the expiration of the permit; or

A continuous period of up to 12 weeks between May 15 and August 15 and four additional weeks during the calendar year, which may be composed of nonconsecutive periods, coinciding with holidays during which local school systems are not in session, provided that all food items are provided free of charge and the organization does not receive funding from the United States Department of Agriculture to operate a food program.

At the request of the county or municipality issuing a permit pursuant to this Code section or at the request of a county or municipality sponsoring an event pursuant to subparagraph (a)(5)(C) of Code Section 26-2-21 or subparagraph (2)(E) of Code Section 26-2-370, the county board of health shall:

Supply educational materials regarding food safety which may be provided to event organizers and the public; and

Conduct food safety inspections to ensure compliance with the provisions of Code Section 26-2-392.

No fees shall be charged to an organization for the issuance of any permit pursuant to this Code section; provided, however, that the county board of health shall be authorized to impose a fee for inspections performed at the request of the issuing county or municipality. Such fee shall be fixed in a reasonable amount such that the proceeds of the fee do not exceed the total direct and indirect costs of conducting the inspection.

For purposes of this Code section, an event may include the provision of food at a third-party location within the same county.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-2-391

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1174, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1220, § 3; Ga. L. 2013, p. 760, § 2/HB 101; Ga. L. 2020, p. 808, § 4/SB 345.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, inserted the proviso at the end of the first sentence; added the second sentence; and deleted “by a county or municipality” following “such permit” at the end of the last sentence.

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 5, 2020, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a), (b), and (d); deleted “; provided, however, that the county or municipality may delegate the authority to issue such permits to the county board of health” following “organization” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (a); rewrote subsection (b); in subsection (d), substituted “any permit pursuant to this Code section; provided, however, that the county board of health shall be authorized to impose a fee for inspections performed at the request of the issuing county or municipality” for “any such permit” and added the second sentence; and added subsections (c) and (e).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2013 amendment of this Code section, see 30 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2013).

26-2-392.
Standards for food, labeling, and containers; protection from contamination; temperature; prohibited foods; utensils and equipment; ice; transport to other location; reuse at another event; handwashing facilities; unapproved facilities; use of offsite kitchens.

This Code section applies to food items prepared and offered for sale or service by organizations at events covered under this article. Food shall be in sound condition, free from spoilage, filth, or other contamination and shall be safe for human consumption. Food shall be obtained from sources that comply with all laws relating to food and food labeling. The use of food in hermetically sealed containers that was not prepared in a licensed food processing establishment is prohibited.

At all times, including while being stored, prepared, displayed, served, or transported, food shall be protected from potential contamination, including dust, insects, rodents, unclean equipment and utensils, unnecessary handling, flooding, drainage, and overhead leakage or overhead drippage from condensation.

Meat, poultry, seafood, and other animal products shall be cooked to at least the safe minimum cooking temperatures recommended by the United States Department of Agriculture. No raw or undercooked animal products shall be served.

Time/temperature control for safety foods to be served at an event shall be maintained at 41 degrees Fahrenheit or less if held cold or 135 degrees Fahrenheit or more if held hot. A thin probe thermometer shall be used to check temperatures of such foods. The preparation of the following time/temperature control for safety foods is prohibited unless the organization has an established hazard control program:

Pastries filled with cream or synthetic cream;

Custards;

Products similar to the products listed in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection; or

Salads containing meat, poultry, eggs, or fish.

Frozen desserts shall only be produced using commercially pasteurized mixes or ingredients.

Suitable utensils, as needed for serving, must be provided to eliminate bare-hand contact with cooked or ready-to-eat foods. All utensils and equipment shall be washed, rinsed, and sanitized periodically as necessary to prevent contamination or a buildup of food, using separate basins for washing, rinsing, and sanitizing. Disposable utensils may be utilized to meet such requirement.

Ice that is consumed or that contacts food shall be from an approved source and protected from contamination until used. Ice used for cooling stored food shall not be used for human consumption. Food shall be served in an individual-meal type of container and handed to the customer. Food items shall not be transported for sale at any other location or sold, held, or reused at another event.

A convenient handwashing facility shall be available for use by individuals preparing and serving food. This facility shall consist of, at least, warm running water, soap, and individual paper towels. Individuals who prepare or serve food shall not make bare-hand contact with ready-to-eat food. Individuals who have a known communicable or transmittable disease, as defined by the Department of Public Health for these purposes, shall not prepare or serve food at an event.

This Code section shall in no way be construed to allow the sale of food items which have been packaged, bottled, or canned in unapproved facilities. Food items prepared in private homes are prohibited; provided, however, that this shall not apply to any food item produced in compliance with a license issued by the Department of Agriculture pursuant to Article 2 of this chapter.

County boards of health are authorized to provide staff assistance to organizations at events covered under this article for the purpose of providing food safety instruction.

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit an organization from using an offsite kitchen to prepare food for an event permitted under this article, so long as the offsite kitchen complies with the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-2-392

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1174, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1220, § 3; Ga. L. 2020, p. 808, § 4/SB 345.

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 5, 2020, inserted “or service” in the first sentence of subsection (a); deleted the former second sentence of subsection (b), which read: “The temperature of potentially hazardous food shall be either 45 degrees Fahrenheit or below or 140 degrees Fahrenheit or above at all times”; added subsection (c); redesignated former subsections (c) and (d) as present subsections (d) and (e), respectively; in subsection (d), added the first and second sentences and substituted “time/temperature control for safety” for “potentially hazardous” in the third sentence; rewrote subsection (f); redesignated former subsections (e) through (h) as present subsections (g) through (j), respectively; added the second sentence in subsection (i); and added subsection (k).

26-2-393.
Enforcement of article.

The county or municipality issuing a permit for the operation of a nonprofit food sales and food service event shall be authorized to enforce the provisions of this article and any party whose property is used for the operation of a nonprofit food sales or food service event without such party’s consent may seek legal and equitable remedies including, but not limited to, damages and injunctive relief against unauthorized users.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-2-393

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1174, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1220, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-5/HB 214; Ga. L. 2013, p. 760, § 3/HB 101; Ga. L. 2020, p. 808, § 4/SB 345.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “and any party whose property is used for the operation of a nonprofit food sales or food service event without such party’s written authorization may seek legal and equitable remedies including, but not limited to, damages and injunctive relief against unauthorized users” for “; provided, however, no adverse action against an organization may be taken by a county or municipality or any agent of a county or municipality, including a denial of a permit or revocation of a permit, or citation for violation of this article, without the written approval of such action by the district health director” at the end of subsection (a).

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 5, 2020, deleted the subsection (a) designation; substituted “consent” for “written authorization”; and deleted former subsection (b), which read: “Any organization which is aggrieved or adversely affected by any final order or action of a county board of health or district health director may have review thereof by appeal to the commissioner of public health or his or her designee. Appeals to the commissioner shall be heard after not more than eight hours.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

For article on the 2013 amendment of this Code section, see 30 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2013).